Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2901.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Candidate” means an individual who has taken affirmative action to become a candidate for State, county, local, or legislative office in a primary, special, general, or local election. An affirmative action shall include one or more of the following:

accepting contributions or making expenditures totaling $500.00 or more;

filing the requisite petition for nomination under this title or being nominated by primary or caucus; or

announcing that the individual seeks an elected position as a State, county, or local officer or a position as Representative or Senator in the General Assembly.

“Candidate’s committee” means the candidate’s campaign staff, whether paid or unpaid.

“Clearly identified,” with respect to a candidate, means:

the name of the candidate appears;

a photograph or drawing of the candidate appears; or

the identity of the candidate is apparent by unambiguous reference.

“Contribution” means a payment, distribution, advance, deposit, loan, or gift of money or anything of value, paid or promised to be paid for the purpose of influencing an election, advocating a position on a public question, or supporting or opposing one or more candidates in any election. As used in this chapter, “contribution” shall not include any of the following:

a personal loan of money to a candidate from a lending institution made in the ordinary course of business;

services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering their time on behalf of a candidate, political committee, or political party;

unreimbursed travel expenses paid for by an individual for himself or herself who volunteers personal services to a candidate;

unreimbursed campaign-related travel expenses paid for by the candidate or the candidate’s spouse;

the use by a candidate or volunteer of his or her own personal property, including offices, telephones, computers, and similar equipment;

the use of a political party’s offices, telephones, computers, and similar equipment;

the payment by a political party of the costs of preparation, display, or mailing or other distribution of a party candidate listing;

documents, in printed or electronic form, including party platforms, single copies of issue papers, information pertaining to the requirements of this title, lists of registered voters, and voter identification information created, obtained, or maintained by a political party for the general purpose of party building and provided to a candidate who is a member of that party or to another political party;

compensation paid by a political party to its employees whose job responsibilities are not for the specific and exclusive benefit of a single candidate in any election;

compensation paid by a political party to its employees or consultants for the purpose of providing assistance to another political party;

campaign training sessions provided to three or more candidates;

costs paid for by a political party in connection with a campaign event at which three or more candidates are present; or

activity or communication designed to encourage individuals to register to vote or to vote if that activity or communication does not mention or depict a clearly identified candidate.

“Election” means the procedure whereby the voters of this State or any of its political subdivisions select a person to be a candidate for public office or to fill a public office or to act on public questions, including voting on constitutional amendments. Each primary, general, special, or local election shall constitute a separate election.

“Electioneering communication” means any communication that refers to a clearly identified candidate for office and that promotes or supports a candidate for that office or attacks or opposes a candidate for that office, regardless of whether the communication expressly advocates a vote for or against a candidate, including communications published in any newspaper or periodical or broadcast on radio or television or over the Internet or any public address system; placed on any billboards, outdoor facilities, buttons, or printed material attached to motor vehicles, window displays, posters, cards, pamphlets, leaflets, flyers, or other circulars; or contained in any direct mailing, robotic phone calls, or mass electronic or digital communications.

“Expenditure” means a payment, disbursement, distribution, advance, deposit, loan, or gift of money or anything of value, paid or promised to be paid, for the purpose of influencing an election, advocating a position on a public question, or supporting or opposing one or more candidates.

Expenditures may include those expenses that are necessary to allow a candidate to campaign, such as expenses for the care of a dependent family member that are incurred as a direct result of campaign activity.

As used in this chapter, “expenditure” shall not include any of the following:

a personal loan of money to a candidate from a lending institution made in the ordinary course of business;

services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering their time on behalf of a candidate, political committee, or political party;

unreimbursed travel expenses paid for by an individual for himself or herself who volunteers personal services to a candidate; or

unreimbursed campaign-related travel expenses paid for by the candidate or the candidate’s spouse.

“Four-year general election cycle” means the 48-month period that begins 38 days after a general election for a four-year-term office.

“Full name” means an individual’s full first name, middle name or initial, if any, and full legal last name, making the identity of the person who made the contribution apparent by unambiguous reference.

“Independent expenditure-only political committee” means a political committee that conducts its activities entirely independent of candidates; does not give contributions to candidates, political committees, or political parties; does not make related expenditures; and is not closely related to a political party or to a political committee that makes contributions to candidates or makes related expenditures.

“Mass media activity” means a television commercial, radio commercial, Internet advertisement, mass mailing, mass electronic or digital communication, literature drop, newspaper or periodical advertisement, robotic phone call, or telephone bank, that includes the name or likeness of a clearly identified candidate for office.

“Party candidate listing” means any communication by a political party that:

lists the names of at least three candidates for election to public office;

is distributed through public advertising such as broadcast stations, cable television, newspapers, and similar media or through direct mail, telephone, electronic mail, a publicly accessible site on the Internet, or personal delivery;

treats all candidates in the communication in a substantially similar manner; and

is limited to:

the identification of each candidate, with which pictures may be used;

the offices sought;

the offices currently held by the candidates;

the party affiliation of the candidates and a brief statement about the party or the candidates’ positions, philosophy, goals, accomplishments, or biographies;

encouragement to vote for the candidates identified; and

information about voting, such as voting hours and locations.

“Political committee” or “political action committee” means any formal or informal committee of two or more individuals or a corporation, labor organization, public interest group, or other entity, not including a political party, that accepts contributions of $1,000.00 or more and makes expenditures of $1,000.00 or more in any two-year general election cycle for the purpose of supporting or opposing one or more candidates, influencing an election, or advocating a position on a public question in any election, and includes an independent expenditure-only political committee and a legislative leadership political committee.

“Political party” means a political party organized under chapter 45 of this title and any committee established, financed, maintained, or controlled by the party, including any subsidiary, branch, or local unit thereof, and shall be considered a single, unified political party. The national affiliate of the political party shall be considered a separate political party.

“Public question” means an issue that is before the voters for a binding decision.

“Single source” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, labor organization, or any other organization or group of persons that is not a political committee or political party.

“Telephone bank” means more than 500 telephone calls of an identical or substantially similar nature that are made to the general public within any 30-day period.

“Two-year general election cycle” means the 24-month period that begins 38 days after a general election.

“Legislative leadership political committee” means a political committee established by or on behalf of a political party caucus within a chamber of the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2015, No. 49

, § 9;

2017, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 16, 2018;

2021, No. 8

, § 1, eff. April 13, 2021;

2021, No. 8

, § 1, eff. April 13, 2021.

§ 2902.
Exceptions.

The definitions of “contribution,” “expenditure,” and “electioneering communication” shall not apply to:

any news story, commentary, or editorial distributed through the facilities of any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, or other periodical publication that has not been paid for or such facilities are not owned or controlled by any political party, committee, or candidate; or

any communication distributed through a public access television station if the communication complies with the laws and rules governing the station and if all candidates in the race have an equal opportunity to promote their candidacies through the station.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2903.
Penalties.

A person who knowingly and intentionally violates a provision of subchapter 2, 3, or 4 of this chapter shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned not more than six months, or both.

A person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $10,000.00 for each violation and shall refund to the Secretary of State an amount equivalent to any contributions or expenditures that violate subdivision 2983(b)(1) of this chapter.

In addition to the other penalties provided in this section, a State’s Attorney or the Attorney General may institute any appropriate action, injunction, or other proceeding to prevent, restrain, correct, or abate any violation of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2015, No. 30

, § 29a, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2904.
Civil investigation.

The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney, whenever he or she has reason to believe any person to be or to have been in violation of this chapter or of any rule made pursuant to this chapter, may examine or cause to be examined by any agent or representative designated by him or her for that purpose any books, records, papers, memoranda, or physical objects of any nature bearing upon each alleged violation and may demand written responses under oath to questions bearing upon each alleged violation.
(a) (1) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney, whenever he or she has reason to believe any person to be or to have been in violation of this chapter or of any rule made pursuant to this chapter, may examine or cause to be examined by any agent or representative designated by him or her for that purpose any books, records, papers, memoranda, or physical objects of any nature bearing upon each alleged violation and may demand written responses under oath to questions bearing upon each alleged violation.

The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may require the attendance of such person or of any other person having knowledge in the premises in the county where such person resides or has a place of business or in Washington County if such person is a nonresident or has no place of business within the State and may take testimony and require proof material for his or her information and may administer oaths or take acknowledgment in respect of any book, record, paper, or memorandum.

The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney shall serve notice of the time, place, and cause of such examination or attendance or notice of the cause of the demand for written responses personally or by certified mail upon such person at his or her principal place of business or, if such place is not known, to his or her last known address. Such notice shall include a statement that a knowing and intentional violation of subchapters 2 through 4 of this chapter is subject to criminal prosecution.

Any book, record, paper, memorandum, or other information produced by any person pursuant to this section shall not, unless otherwise ordered by a court of this State for good cause shown, be disclosed to any person other than the authorized agent or representative of the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney or another law enforcement officer engaged in legitimate law enforcement activities unless with the consent of the person producing the same, except that any transcript of oral testimony, written responses, documents, or other information produced pursuant to this section may be used in the enforcement of this chapter, including in connection with any civil action brought under section 2903 of this subchapter or subsection (c) of this section.

Nothing in this subsection is intended to prevent the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney from disclosing the results of an investigation conducted under this section, including the grounds for his or her decision as to whether to bring an enforcement action alleging a violation of this chapter or of any rule made pursuant to this chapter.

This subsection shall not be applicable to any criminal investigation or prosecution brought under the laws of this or any state.

A person upon whom a notice is served pursuant to the provisions of this section shall comply with its terms unless otherwise provided by the order of a court of this State.
(b) (1) A person upon whom a notice is served pursuant to the provisions of this section shall comply with its terms unless otherwise provided by the order of a court of this State.

Any person who, with intent to avoid, evade, or prevent compliance, in whole or in part, with any civil investigation under this section, removes from any place; conceals, withholds, or destroys; or mutilates, alters, or by any other means falsifies any documentary material in the possession, custody, or control of any person subject to such notice or mistakes or conceals any information shall be fined not more than $5,000.00.

Whenever any person fails to comply with any notice served upon him or her under this section or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction of any such material cannot be done and the person refuses to surrender the material, the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may file, in the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or has his or her principal place of business or in Washington County if the person is a nonresident or has no principal place of business in this State, and serve upon the person a petition for an order of the court for the enforcement of this section.
(c) (1) Whenever any person fails to comply with any notice served upon him or her under this section or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction of any such material cannot be done and the person refuses to surrender the material, the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may file, in the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or has his or her principal place of business or in Washington County if the person is a nonresident or has no principal place of business in this State, and serve upon the person a petition for an order of the court for the enforcement of this section.

Whenever any petition is filed under this section, the court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine the matter so presented and to enter any order or orders as may be required to carry into effect the provisions of this section. Any disobedience of any order entered under this section by any court shall be punished as a contempt of the court.

Any person aggrieved by a civil investigation conducted under this section may seek relief from Washington Superior Court or the Superior Court in the county in which the aggrieved person resides. Except for cases the court considers to be of greater importance, proceedings before Superior Court as authorized by this section shall take precedence on the docket over all other cases.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014;

2017, No. 50

, § 64;

2017, No. 79

, § 5, eff. June 14, 2017.

§ 2904a.
Reports to the State Ethics Commission.

Upon receipt of a complaint made in regard to a violation of this chapter or of any rule made pursuant to this chapter, the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney shall:

Forward a copy of the complaint to the State Ethics Commission established in 3 V.S.A. chapter 31. The Attorney General or State’s Attorney shall provide this information to the Commission within 10 days of his or her receipt of the complaint.

File a report with the Commission regarding his or her decision as to whether to bring an enforcement action as a result of that complaint. The Attorney General or State’s Attorney shall make this report within 10 days of that decision.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 79

, § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 2905.
Adjustments for inflation.

Whenever it is required by this chapter, the Secretary of State shall make adjustments to monetary amounts provided in this chapter based on the Consumer Price Index. Increases shall be rounded to the nearest $10.00 and shall apply for the term of two two-year general election cycles. Increases shall be effective for the first two-year general election cycle beginning after the general election held in 2016.
(a) (1) Whenever it is required by this chapter, the Secretary of State shall make adjustments to monetary amounts provided in this chapter based on the Consumer Price Index. Increases shall be rounded to the nearest $10.00 and shall apply for the term of two two-year general election cycles. Increases shall be effective for the first two-year general election cycle beginning after the general election held in 2016.

As used in this section, Consumer Price Index shall mean the Northeast Region Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers, designated as “CPI-U,” in the northeast region, as published by the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

On or before the first two-year general election cycle beginning after the general election held in 2016, the Secretary of State shall calculate and publish on the online database set forth in section 2906 of this chapter each adjusted monetary amount that will apply to those two two-year general election cycles. On or before the beginning of each second subsequent two-year general election cycle, the Secretary of State shall publish the amount of each adjusted monetary amount that shall apply for that two-year general election cycle and the next two-year general election cycle.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2015, No. 30

, § 30, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2906.
Campaign database; candidate information web page.

Campaign database. For each election, the Secretary of State shall develop and continually update a publicly accessible campaign database, which shall be made available to the public through the Secretary of State’s home page online service or through printed reports from the Secretary of State in response to a public request within 14 days of the date of the request. The database shall contain:

at least the following information for all candidates for statewide, county, and local office and for the General Assembly:

for candidates receiving public financing grants, the amount of each grant awarded; and

the information contained in any reports submitted pursuant to subchapter 4 of this chapter;

an Internet link to campaign finance reports filed by Vermont’s candidates for federal office;

the adjustments for inflation made to monetary amounts as required by this chapter; and

any photographs, biographical sketches, and position statements submitted to the Secretary of State pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

Candidate information web page.

Any candidate for statewide office and any candidate for federal office qualified to be on the ballot in this State may submit to the Secretary of State a photograph, biographical sketch, and position statement of a length and format specified by the Secretary of State for the purposes of preparing a candidate information web page within the website of the Secretary of State.

Without making any substantive changes in the material presented, the Secretary of State shall prepare a candidate information web page on the Secretary of State’s website that includes the candidates’ photographs, biographies, and position statements; a brief explanation of the process used to obtain candidate submissions; and, with respect to offices for which public financing is available, an indication of which candidates are receiving Vermont campaign finance grants and which candidates are not receiving Vermont campaign finance grants.

The Secretary of State shall populate the candidate information web page by posting each candidate’s submission no later than three business days after receiving the candidate’s submission.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2907.
Administration.

The Secretary of State shall administer this chapter and shall perform all duties required under this chapter. The Secretary of State may employ or contract for the services of persons necessary for performance of these duties.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.